Illinois, session 104th, HB4689.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Regional Planning Act is amended by adding 5Section 75 as follows: 6    (70 ILCS 1707/75 new)7    Sec. 75. Northeastern Illinois water governance report.8    (a) Subject to appropriation, CMAP, in consultation with 9the Northeastern Illinois Water Governance Advisory Committee 10created under subsection (d), shall develop and submit to the 11Governor and General Assembly a report containing a regional 12planning-level assessment of the sufficiency, management, and 13governance of water resources and drinking water systems in 14northeastern Illinois. Additionally, the report shall identify 15policy options to strengthen long-term water security, 16reliability, affordability, and coordination within the 17region.18    The report may draw upon existing studies, publicly 19available data, and stakeholder input to identify regional 20trends, risks, and opportunities related to water supply, 21infrastructure, and governance. The report shall include the 22following topics as they pertain to the region as defined in 23Section 10:  HB4689 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 18079 RTM 31518 b1        (1) water supply needs, including any expected changes 2    to water demand and opportunities to conserve or reuse 3    water;4        (2) potential climate and environmental risks to water 5    supply and infrastructure in the region;6        (3) a planning-level assessment of factors affecting 7    redundancy and reliability of water infrastructure in the 8    region, including whether water service can be maintained 9    if infrastructure fails;10        (4) an assessment of technical, managerial, or 11    financial capacity challenges facing water utilities in 12    the region or any combination of those challenges;13        (5) regional trends in regulatory compliance and water 14    quality;15        (6) data, information, and coordination necessary for 16    utilities and State agencies to better understand and 17    manage water resources effectively;18        (7) recommendations for at least 2 governance or 19    collaboration models that could better address water 20    quality, long-term water security, and water affordability 21    in the region, including case studies of examples from 22    other regions and states; and23        (8) recommendations on ways State agencies and 24    departments could improve data collection, planning, 25    coordination, and regulation of water in the region.26    (b) The assessment described in subsection (a) shall be   HB4689 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 18079 RTM 31518 b1submitted to the General Assembly and Governor within 24 2months of the date of transfer to CMAP of funds appropriated 3for the purpose of conducting the assessment.4    (c) To facilitate the creation of the report described in 5subsection (a), relevant State agencies, universities, and 6research institutes, including the Environmental Protection 7Agency, the Department of Natural Resources, the Department of 8Public Health, and the Illinois State Water Survey, shall 9provide relevant data sets, documentation, and information to 10CMAP upon request, subject to applicable confidentiality 11requirements and data-sharing restrictions. Such data shall be 12provided as soon as practicable.13    In developing the report, CMAP may request information 14relevant to this Section from public water systems, utilities, 15and other stakeholders in the region through surveys, 16interviews, or other outreach methods to better understand 17system conditions, infrastructure needs, and operational 18challenges. Participation in the requests shall be voluntary.19    CMAP shall safeguard data obtained during this process to 20prevent unauthorized access, use, disclosure, or alteration; 21meet or exceed applicable federal and State security 22standards; and ensure data integrity, availability, and 23confidentiality.24    (d) The Northeastern Illinois Water Governance Advisory 25Committee is created. The membership of the Northeastern 26Illinois Water Governance Advisory Committee shall include,   HB4689 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 18079 RTM 31518 b1but shall not be limited to:2        (1) the Director of the Environmental Protection 3    Agency or the Director's designee;4        (2) the Director of Natural Resources or the 5    Director's designee;6        (3) the Director of the Illinois State Water Survey or 7    the Director's designee;8        (4) the Director of Public Health or the Director's 9    designee;10        (5) the Governor or the Governor's designee;11        (6) two members who are representatives of 12    municipalities located within Cook County, at least one of 13    which is a member of the south suburban Mayors and 14    Managers Association, appointed by the President of the 15    Cook County Board of Commissioners;16        (7) one member who is a representative of a 17    municipality located within DuPage County, appointed by 18    the DuPage County Board Chair;19        (8) one member who is a representative of a 20    municipality located within Will County, appointed by the 21    Will County Board Chair;22        (9) one member who is a representative of a 23    municipality located within Lake County, appointed by the 24    Lake County Board Chair;25        (10) one member who is a representative of a 26    municipality located within Kane County, appointed by the   HB4689 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 18079 RTM 31518 b1    Kane County Board Chair;2        (11) one member who is a representative of a 3    municipality located within Kendall County, appointed by 4    the Kendall County Board Chair;5        (12) one member who is a representative of a 6    municipality located within McHenry County, appointed by 7    the McHenry County Board Chair;8        (13) one member who is a representative from the City 9    of Chicago, appointed by the Mayor of the City of Chicago;10        (14) two members representing water commissions formed 11    under the Water Commission Act of 1985, Municipal Joint 12    Action Water Agencies formed under Section 3.1 of the 13    Intergovernmental Cooperation Act, or regional water 14    commissions formed under Article 11, Division 135.5 of the 15    Illinois Municipal Code, appointed by the Director of 16    CMAP;17        (15) one member who is a representative from a public 18    utility, as defined in Section 3-105 of the Public 19    Utilities Act, that provides water service in the State of 20    Illinois, appointed by the Director of CMAP;21        (16) one member who is a representative of the 22    Illinois environmental protection and conservation 23    community, appointed by the Director of CMAP;24        (17) one member who is a representative from a 25    nonprofit civic organization, appointed by the Director of 26    CMAP;  HB4689 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 18079 RTM 31518 b1        (18) one member who is a representative from organized 2    labor, appointed by the Director of CMAP;3        (19) one member representing an environmental justice 4    organization, appointed by the Director of CMAP;5        (20) one member representing a consumer or utility 6    customer advocacy organization, appointed by the Director 7    of CMAP;8        (21) one expert in the technical, financial, and 9    managerial capacities of water utilities, appointed by the 10    Director of CMAP; and11        (22) one expert in the management of regional drinking 12    water or wastewater utilities, appointed by the Director 13    of CMAP.14    (e) Appointments to the Northeastern Illinois Water 15Governance Advisory Committee shall be made within 90 days 16after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th 17General Assembly.18    (f) Members of the Northeastern Illinois Water Governance 19Advisory Committee shall serve without compensation.20    (g) The Northeastern Illinois Water Governance Advisory 21Committee shall be dissolved on the day after submission of 22the report described in subsection (a) to the General Assembly 23and Governor.24    (h) This Section is repealed on December 31, 2030.